Hawaii statutes.
[§171-137] Preference. Preference for
a lease of public lands within an industrial park shall be given to an eligible
lessee who is a small business. For the purpose of this section, "small
business" means the same as "small business concern" under section
210-1. [L 1988, c 361, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next